Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-358.06
Delinquent permanent child or spousal support payments; lien.

A lien upon the property of one who is delinquent in permanent child or spousal support payments may be instituted and enforced according to the terms of section 42-371.

Laws 1975, LB 212, § 8;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 13.